en: Scale units: Dual (metric & imperial); Imperial (in); Metric (mm/cm); No scale; Other
ko: 축척 단위: 이중(미터법 및 야드파운드법); 야드파운드법(인치); 미터법(mm/cm); 눈금 없음; 기타
zh-TW: 比例單位: 雙制 (公制與英制); 英制 (in); 公制 (mm/cm); 無刻度; 其他
hr-HR: Jedinice skale: Dvostruko (metričko i imperijalno); Imperijalno (inči); Metričko (mm/cm); Bez mjerila; Ostalo
fr: Unités de mesure: Double (métrique et impérial); Impérial (po); Métrique (mm/cm); Sans échelle; Autre
pt-BR: Escala unidades: Duplo (métrico e imperial); Imperial (pol.); Métrico (mm/cm); Sem escala; Outros
sl-SI: Enote merilne lestvice: Dvojne (metrične in imperialne); Imperialne (in); Metrične (mm/cm); Brez merila; Drugo
ja: スケール単位: デュアル (メートル法とヤード・ポンド法); ヤード・ポンド法 (インチ); メートル法 (mm/cm); 目盛りなし; その他
nb: Skalaenheter: Begge (metrisk og imperisk); Imperisk (tommer); Metrisk (mm/cm); Ingen skala; Annet
es: Unidades de escala: Dual (sistema métrico e imperial); Imperial (pulgadas); Métrico (mm/cm); Sin escala; Otro
zh-CN: 刻度单位: 双单位（公制和英制）; 英制 (in); 公制 (mm/cm); 无刻度; 其他
de: Maßeinheiten: Beides (metrisch & imperial); Imperial (in); Metrisch (mm/cm); Kein Maßstab; Sonstige
lt-LT: Skalės vienetai: Dviguba (metrinė ir imperinė); Imperinė (col.); Metrinė (mm / cm); Be mastelio; Kita
vi: Đơn vị tỷ lệ: Kép (hệ mét và hệ đo lường Anh); Hệ đo lường Anh (inch); Hệ mét (mm/cm); Không có tỷ lệ; Khác
hu: Mértékegységek: Kettős (metrikus és angolszász); Angolszász (hüvelyk); Metrikus (mm/cm); Skála nélkül; Egyéb
th: หน่วยขยายสเกล: คู่ (เมตริกและอิมพีเรียล); อิมพีเรียล (นิ้ว); เมตริก (มม./ซม.); ไม่มีสัดส่วน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Unitățile de scară: Dual (metric și imperial); Imperial (in); Metric (mm/cm); Fără scară; Altele
it: Unità di scala: Doppio (metrico e imperiale); Imperiale (pollici); Metrico (mm/cm); Nessuna scala; Altro
bg-BG: Мерни единици на скалата: Двойни (метрични и имперски); Имперски (инчове); Метрични (мм/см); Без мащаб; Други
el: Μονάδες κλίμακας: Διπλό (μετρικό & βρετανικό); Βρετανικό (in); Μετρικό (mm/cm); Χωρίς κλίμακα; Άλλο
ru: Единицы шкалы: Двойная (метрическая и имперская); Имперская (дюймы); Метрическая (мм/см); Без шкалы; Другое
pt-PT: Unidades de escala: Dupla (métrica e imperial); Imperial (pol.); Métrica (mm/cm); Sem escala; Outro
pl: Jednostki skali: Podwójna (metryczna i imperialna); Imperialna (cale); Metryczna (mm/cm); Bez skali; Inna
fi: Pienoismallin mittayksiköt: Molemmat (metrinen ja brittiläinen); Brittiläinen (tuuma); Metrinen (mm/cm); Ei mittakaavaa; Muu
cs: Jednotky měřítka: Dvojí (metrické a imperiální); Imperiální (palce); Metrické (mm/cm); Bez měřítka; Jiné
tr: Ölçü birimleri: Çift (metrik ve emperyal); Emperyal (inç); Metrik (mm/cm); Ölçek yok; Diğer
nl: Schaaleenheden: Beide (metrisch en imperiaal); Imperiaal (inch); Metrisch (mm/cm); Geen schaal; Overig
da: Skala-enheder: Dobbelt (metrisk og imperial); Imperial (tommer); Metrisk (mm/cm); Ingen skala; Andet
sv: Skalindelning: Dubbla (metriska och imperiska); Imperial (tum); Metrisk (mm/cm); Ingen skala; Övrigt
sk-SK: Jednotky mierky: Kombinované (metrické a imperiálne); Imperiálne (palce); Metrické (mm/cm); Bez mierky; Iné